Massachusetts, session 194th, S152.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 268 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 21A the
following new section:-
Section 21B. A person over the age of 21 who is employed by or contracts with a public
or private school, the department of youth services, the department of children and families, the
department of mental health, the department of developmental services or a private institution
that provides services to clients of such departments, who is a teacher, administrator or a person
in a similar position of authority in the school, department or institution and, in the course of
such employment or contract or as a result thereof, engages in, within or outside of the school,
department or institution, sexual relations with a person who is: (i) under the age of 19, has not
of 2

received a high school diploma, general educational development certificate or equivalent
document and is served by the school, department or institution; or (ii) under the age of 22, has
special needs under chapter 71B, has not received a high school diploma, general educational
development certificate or equivalent document and is served by the school, department or
institution, shall have a cause of action against such an employee or contractor, under chapter
260, section 4C. In a civil action commenced under said section, a person served by such school,
department or institution shall be deemed incapable of consent to sexual relations with such an
employee or contractor.
of 2